Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-2] Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter:

"Applied behavior analysis" means
interventions that are based on scientific research and the direct observation
and measurement of behavior and the environment.

"Behavior Analyst Certification Board"
means the international accredited Behavior Analyst Certification Board or its
successor.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Licensed behavior analyst" means a
person:

(1) Who engages in the practice of behavior analysis
and uses the title of licensed behavior analyst;

(2) Who has been issued a license under this chapter;
and

(3) Whose license is in effect and not revoked,
suspended, or encumbered.

"Practice of behavior analysis" means
the design, implementation, and evaluation of instructional and environmental
modifications to produce socially significant improvements in human behavior.
Practice of behavior analysis includes the empirical identification of
functional relations between behavior and environmental factors, known as
functional assessment and analysis. Practice of behavior analysis also
includes the use of contextual factors, motivating operations, antecedent
stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other consequences to help people develop
new behaviors, increase or decrease existing behaviors, and emit behaviors
under specific environmental conditions. Practice of behavior analysis
expressly excludes psychological testing, diagnosis of a mental or physical
disorder, neuropsychology, psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy,
psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy, and long-term counseling as treatment modalities.
[L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next